Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 11. Chitina Dip Net Fishery.

Sec. 16.10.570.
Chitina dip net fishery.

The department, with the cooperation of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities and the Department of Natural Resources, shall

maintain and improve state-owned land used to access the Chitina dip net fishery;

maintain and operate sanitary facilities provided for the use of persons participating in the Chitina dip net fishery; and

prepare a publication showing public access routes to fishing sites on public land for the Chitina dip net fishery; the department shall distribute the publication to persons who obtain a Chitina dip net fishing permit and to the public.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 2003; am § 32 ch 18 SLA 2016)

Secs. 16.10.600 — 16.10.620.
Creation of authorities; tax exemption; powers of authority.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 152 SLA 1988.]

Secs. 16.10.650 — 16.10.720.
Fishermen’s mortgage and note program. [Repealed,
§ 72 ch 113 SLA 1982.]